District of Columbia statutes.
29-608.11

Liability of partner and person dissociated as partner when claim against limited liability partnership is barred.

If a claim against a dissolved limited liability partnership is barred under § 29-608.08(c), 29-608.09(c), or 29-608.10, any corresponding claim under § 29-603.06, 29-607.03, or 29-608.06 is also barred.

Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(f)(8)(I), 59 DCR 13171
Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.